Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-429
Cruel and unusual punishment, prohibited.

Punishment by flogging, or by branding, marking, or tattooing on the body, or any other cruel or unusual punishment, may not be adjudged by any court-martial or inflicted upon any person subject to this code. The use of irons, single or double, except for the purpose of safe custody, is prohibited.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 29, p. 1567.